Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 25.1 Employee Criminal Records Check

40.1-25.1-1.
Purpose.

In order to provide protection for persons residing in or receiving services from facilities, programs, or agencies licensed, funded, and/or operated by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, all persons eighteen (18) years or older seeking employment in any facility or program licensed, funded, and/or operated by the department shall be required to undergo a national criminal background check for the purpose of determining whether the prospective employee has been convicted of a crime that bears upon his or her fitness to have the responsibility for the safety and well-being of persons residing in or receiving services from facilities, programs, or agencies licensed, funded, and/or operated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 410, § 1.

40.1-25.1-2.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Agency” means any person or organization that provides day-program services, residential services, support services, or advocacy services for persons with developmental disabilities, persons who are mentally ill, and persons who are substance abusers and that is licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to §

40.1-24-1

et seq.

“Applicant for employment” means a person over the age of eighteen (18) who has applied for and been offered employment in a facility, program, or agency licensed, funded, and/or operated by the department.

“Department” means the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Director” means the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or the designee of the director.

“Employer” means any facility, program, or agency licensed and/or funded by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and shall mean the department when the facility or program is operated by the department.

“Facility” means any community residence, day-treatment program, rehabilitation program, public or private, excluding hospitals, except for the Eleanor Slater Hospital, providing program services that do not constitute medical or custodial care but do offer rehabilitation, habilitation, psychological support, and social guidance.

“Program” means a planned service-delivery system structured to provide specific components, that are responsive to the needs of those served.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 410, § 1.

40.1-25.1-3.
Criminal records check requirement.

Any facility or program licensed by the department pursuant to §

40.1-24-1

et seq. and any facility or program operated by the department shall require all applicants for employment, if that employment involves routine contact with patients, residents, or clients without the presence of other employees, to apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or, for organizations employing two hundred fifty (250) or more employees only, the office of the attorney general for a nationwide criminal records check. The check will conform to the applicable state and federal standards, including the taking of fingerprints of the applicant. Fingerprints shall be initially submitted to the office of the attorney general for a check of state records and thereafter forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (“FBI”) for a national criminal history check. The criminal records checks as required by this section shall be conducted for every five (5) years of continuous employment from the date of the previous criminal background check.

If any disqualifying information is discovered with respect to the applicant, the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney general will inform the employer, in writing, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, that an item of disqualifying nature has been discovered. In addition, the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney general will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information. The results of the national criminal records check shall be made available to the applicant undergoing a records check and submitting fingerprints.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney general shall inform both the applicant and the employer of this fact.

The employer will maintain on file, subject to investigation by the department, evidence that criminal records checks in accordance with this statute have been initiated on all employees seeking employment after August 1, 2001, and the results of the checks. Failure to maintain the evidence on file will be prima facie grounds to revoke the license or certification of the operator of any facility or program licensed or certified by the department.

It shall be the responsibility of the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department or the office of the attorney general to conduct the national criminal records check for the applicant. Any expense associated with obtaining the criminal records check required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section with respect to organizations employing two hundred fifty (250) or more employees, including the taking of fingerprints of the applicant, shall be paid by the organization requiring the criminal records check.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 348, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 349, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

40.1-25.1-4.
Prior criminal records check.

If an applicant has undergone a national criminal records check within eighteen (18) months of an application for employment, then an employer may request from the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police a letter indicating if any disqualifying information was discovered. The bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department shall respond without disclosing the nature of any disqualifying information. The letter shall be maintained on file to satisfy the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 410, § 1.

40.1-25.1-5.
Destruction of fingerprint records.

At the conclusion of any background check required by this chapter, the state police or the local police department will promptly destroy the fingerprint card of the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 410, § 1.

40.1-25.1-6.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this chapter. The rules shall specify the types of jobs and positions that would require national criminal background checks and the rules shall specify those items of information appearing on a criminal records check that constitute disqualifying information because that information would indicate that the employment could endanger the health or welfare of patients, clients, or residents. The rules and regulations shall specify that the department shall bear the responsibility for the cost of the national background checks. In doing so, the department shall consider and seek all possible avenues of reimbursement for these background checks. In no event shall the provider, the state or local police department, or the applicant be responsible for any portion of the cost of the national background check.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 410, § 1.

40.1-25.1-7.
Immunity from liability.

No employer who disqualifies an individual from employment because of the receipt of a notice of disqualifying information pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for civil damages or subject to any claim, cause of action, or proceeding of any nature as a result of such disqualification.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 410, § 1.